Utah statutes.
75-1-302.   Subject matter jurisdiction.

(1) To the full extent permitted by the Constitution of Utah, the court has jurisdiction over all subject matter relating to:

(a)  estates of decedents, including construction of wills and determination of heirs and successors of decedents, and estates of protected persons;

(b)  protection of minors and incapacitated persons; and

(c)  trusts.

(2)  The court has full power to make orders, judgments, and decrees and take all other action necessary and proper to administer justice in the matters which come before it.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

